Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3913
Judicial district public defender; election; term.

The successor to the judicial district public defender initially appointed shall be elected at the next general election and shall take office at the same time as other elected state officers. The term of office of an elected judicial district public defender shall be four years. With the exception of being nominated and elected within their respective districts, candidates for such office shall be nominated and elected as nearly as may be practicable in the same manner as candidates for the office of Governor. Candidates for such office shall file with the Secretary of State as provided in section 32-607 and pay the filing fee provided in section 32-608.

Laws 1969, c. 234, § 5, p. 864;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 29-1805.05;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 31;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 550.